en: Caviar substitutes from algae, Caviar substitutes from seaweed, Alginate caviar
es: Sucedáneos de caviar a base de algas
fr: Imitation de caviar à base d'algues
hr: Zamjene za kavijar od algi
nl: Kaviaarvervangers op basis van algen

en: Synthetic black caviar
da: Syntetisk sort kaviar
ru: Синтетическая чёрная икра, искусственная чёрная икра

en: Frozen plant-based foods
ca: Aliments vegetals congelats
de: Tiefgekühlte pflanzliche Lebensmittel
es: Alimentos de origen vegetal congelados, Vegetales congelados o ultracongelados, Vegetales congelados
fi: Kasvipohjaiset ruokapakasteet
fr: Aliments à base de plantes surgelés, Aliments à base de plantes congelés
hr: Smrznuta hrana biljnog podrijetla
hu: Fagyasztott növényi alapú ételek
it: Cibi surgelati a base vegetale
nl: Plantaardige diepvriesproducten
pl: Mrożona żywność pochodzenia roślinnego
pt: Alimentos à base de plantas congeladas
ru: Замороженные блюда из растений
zh: 冷冻蔬菜食品

en: Frozen plant-based foods mixes
de: Gefrorene Lebensmittelmischungen auf pflanzlicher Basis
es: Mezclas de vegetales congelados, Mezclas de alimentos de origen vegetal congelados
fi: pakastetut kasvipohjaiset ruokasekoitukset
fr: Mélanges d'aliments à base de plantes surgelés
hr: Smrznute mješavine biljnih namirnica
it: Misti di alimenti a base di verdure congelati
nl: Diepvries plantenmengsels

en: Frozen mixed vegetables, Frozen vegetable mixes
de: Gefrorene Gemüsemischungen
es: Mezclas de verduras y hortalizas congeladas
fi: Pakastevihannessekoitukset
fr: Mélanges de légumes surgelés
hr: Smrznuto miješano povrće
it: Misti di verdure congelati
nl: Diepvriesgroentemelanges
sv: Djupfrysta blandade grönsager, Djupfryst grönsagsblandning, Djupfryst grönsagsmix

en: Frozen spring vegetables
fr: Printanière de légumes surgelée

en: Frozen mixed diced vegetables
fr: Macédoine de légumes surgelée

en: Frozen thinly-shredded vegetables
fr: Julienne de légumes surgelée

en: Frozen diced vegetables
fr: Brunoise de légumes surgelée

en: Frozen mixed vegetables for wok, Frozen mixed wok vegetables
sv: Djupfrysta blandade grönsager för wok, Djupfryst wokgrönsagsblandning, Djupfryst wokgrönsagsmix

en: Mustard greens
fr: Feuilles de moutarde

en: Pan-fried dishes
de: In der Pfanne gebratene Gerichte
es: Platos salteados
fr: Poêlées, Poêlée
hr: Jela pržena u tavi
it: Piatti saltati in padella
nl: Roergebakken gerechten

en: Pan-fried vegetables
fr: Poêlée de légumes

en: Pan-fried meat and vegetable mixes
fr: Poêlée de viande et de légumes

en: Pre-fried potatoes pan-fried with chicken
fr: Poêlée de pommes de terre préfrites au poulet

en: Frozen pan-fried vegetables without mushrooms
fr: Poêlée de légumes assaisonnés surgelée sans champignons

en: Frozen pan-fried Asian-style vegetables, Frozen stir-fried Asian-style vegetables
fr: Poêlée de légumes assaisonnés à l'asiatiques, Wok de légumes surgelés

en: Frozen pan-fried Mediterranean-style grilled vegetables
fr: Poêlée de légumes assaisonnés grillée méridionale surgelée, Poêlée de légumes assaisonnés grillée méditerranéenne surgelée

en: Frozen pan-fried vegetables with mushrooms country-style
fr: Poêlée de légumes assaisonnés aux champignons surgelée, Poêlée de légumes champêtre surgelée

en: Pre-fried potatoes pan-fried with lardoons
fr: Poêlée de pommes de terre préfrites aux lardons